Arkansas, session 2025, HB1795.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Fertility Clinic
Licensure Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-9-201, concerning definitions related to
the licensing of healthcare facilities, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(15) "Fertility clinic" means a medical facility or healthcare
professional that collects or preserves, or both, human embryos for the
creation or the placement of human embryos into a patient

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-9-213, concerning the requirement of a
license to operate in this state as a hospital, recuperation center, or
related institution, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(d) If a medical facility is providing or performing in vitro
fertilization in this state, the medical facility or institution shall also
be licensed separately as a fertility clinic.
*JMB489*
03/14/2025 10:14:46 AM JMB489

HB1795

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 20-9-214(b), concerning the fees for the
operation of institutions providing healthcare services, is amended to read
as follows:
(b) The Department of Health may levy and collect the following annual
fees for issuance of an annual license to hospitals or institutions:
Per facility (unless otherwise noted)
(1) Hospitals (per bed) $ 6.00
(2) Ambulatory Surgery Center 1,000.00
(3) Rural Emergency Hospital 500.00
(4) Hospital-Based Recuperation Center 275.00
(5) Freestanding Recuperation Center 2,000.00
(6) Hospital-Based Alcohol/Drug Unit 75.00
(7) Freestanding Alcohol/Drug Unit 1,000.00
(8) Hospital-Based Outpatient Psychiatric Center 75.00
(9) Freestanding Outpatient Psychiatric Center 1,000.00
(10) Infirmary 100.00
(11) Fertility Clinic 1,000.00
(12) Reissuance of license due to name/address change 100.00

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 9, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 16 — Fertility Clinics

20-9-1601. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, "fertility clinic" means a medical facility
or healthcare professional that collects or preserves, or both, human embryos
for the creation or the placement of human embryos into a patient.

20-9-1602. Reporting.
(a)(1) The Department of Health shall require a fertility clinic to
report to the department all data that is not personally identifiable
information and that is reported to the United States Secretary of Health and
Human Services under the Fertility Clinic Success Rate and Certification Act
of 1992, Pub. L. No. 102-493.
03/14/2025 10:14:46 AM JMB489

HB1795
(2) The department may require a fertility clinic to report to
the department under subdivision (a)(1) of this section at the same time as
the fertility clinic reports to the United States Secretary of Health and
Human Services.
(b) A fertility clinic in this state that violates this section shall
be fined fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) by the department.

20-9-1603. Annual report.
(a) Within twelve (12) months of receiving the data required under §
20-9-1602, the Department of Health shall compile a comprehensive report to
be available on the department's website.
(b)(1) The department shall report annually to:
(A) The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor; and
(B) The House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor.
(2) The report under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall
include a list of licensed fertility clinics available in this state and a
summary of the data that is not personally identifiable information reported
to the department under § 20-9-1602.

20-9-1604. Rules.
The Department of Health shall promulgate rules to implement this
subchapter.












03/14/2025 10:14:46 AM JMB489